Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-723
State officers; other compensation from state; prohibition.

No officer whose salary is fixed by sections 84-608, 84-721, and 84-723 shall receive any compensation from the State of Nebraska other than the salary as fixed by sections 84-608, 84-721, and 84-723.

Laws 1957, c. 397, § 3, p. 1363.